Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-502
Abstracting; district or county judges ineligible.

No district judge or county judge within this state shall engage in the business of abstracting nor be interested directly or indirectly in any company or corporation which is engaged in the business of abstracting while holding office. Any certification of an abstract of title by a judge in violation of this section shall be void.

Laws 1935, c. 148, § 1, p. 551;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-601;

R.S.1943, § 76-502;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 269;

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 2.